Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-6608
Tax credit; reduction, termination, or rescission; repayment or recapture of tax credit.

The failure by an eligible business in fulfilling any requirement of the Renewable Chemical Production Tax Credit Act or any of the terms and obligations of an agreement entered into pursuant to section 77-6604 may result in the reduction, termination, or rescission of the tax credits under the act and may subject the eligible business to the repayment or recapture of tax credits claimed.

Laws 2020, LB1107, § 74.